en: Black lentils, Beluga lentils
bg: Черна леща
de: Schwarze Linsen
es: Lentejas negras, Lentejas beluga, Lentejas caviar
fr: lentilles noires, lentilles beluga
hr: Crna leća
nl: Zwarte Belugalinzen
pl: Soczewica czarna

en: Brown lentils
bg: Кафява леща
de: Braune Linsen
es: Lentejas pardas, Lentejas pardinas, Lentejas pardina
fr: lentilles brunes
hr: Smeđa leća
nl: Bruine linzen
pl: Soczewica brązowa

en: Decorticated lentils
de: Geschälte Linsen
es: Lentejas peladas
fr: Lentilles décortiquées
hr: Ukrašena leća
it: Lenticchie decorticate
nl: Gepelde linzen

en: Blonde lentils
de: Gelbe Linsen
es: Lentejas rubias
fr: lentilles blondes
hr: Plava leća
nl: Witte linzen

en: Dried blond lentils
fr: Lentilles blondes sèches

en: Cooked blond lentils
fr: Lentilles blondes cuites

en: Decorticated blonde lentils
es: Lentejas rubias peladas
fr: Lentilles blondes décortiquées
hr: Ukrašena plava leća

en: Decorticated red lentils
de: Geschälte rote Linsen
es: Lentejas rojas peladas
fr: lentilles corail, lentilles roses, Lentilles rouges décortiquées
hr: Ukrašena crvena leća
it: Lenticchie rosse decorticate
nl: Gepelde rode linzen

en: Dried pink lentils, Dried red lentils
fr: Lentilles corail sèches

en: Cooked pink lentils, Cooked red lentils
fr: Lentille corail cuites

en: Decorticated whole red lentils
es: Lentejas rojas peladas enteras

en: Decorticated split red lentils, Red split lentils
es: Lentejas rojas peladas partidas

en: Green lentils
bg: Зелена леща
de: Grüne Linsen
es: Lentejas verdes, Lentejas verdinas
fi: vihreät linssit
fr: Lentilles vertes
hr: leća zelena
it: Lenticchie verdi
nl: Groenlinzen
pl: Soczewica zielona
pt: Lentilhas verdes, Lentilhas verde

en: Cooked green lentils
fr: Lentilles vertes cuites
hr: Kuhana zelena leća
pl: Soczewica zielona gotowana

en: Dried green lentils
de: Getrocknete grüne Linsen
fr: Lentilles vertes sèches
hr: Sušena zelena leća
pl: Soczewica zielona sucha, Soczewica zielona suszona

en: Castellana Lentils, Casrtilian lentils
fr: Lentilles Castellana, lentilles castillanes, lentilles castellane

en: Red lentils
bg: Червена леща
de: Rote Linsen
es: Lentejas rojas
fi: Punaiset linssit
fr: Lentilles rouges
hr: leća crvena
it: Lenticchie rosse
nl: Rode linzen
pl: Soczewica czerwona

en: Lupin beans, Lupins, Lupini beans
de: Lupinenbohnen
es: Altramuces, Altramuz, Chochos, Lupínes, Lupinos
fr: Lupins
hr: Bobe lupine
ja: ルパン豆
la: Lupinus
nl: Lupine
pl: Łubin, fasolki łubinu

en: lupin grains
fr: Graines de lupin

en: Mat beans
de: Mattenbohne
fr: Haricots mat
gu: મઠ
hi: मोठ दाल
hr: Mat grah
ja: モスビーン
la: Vigna aconitifolia
mr: मटकी
vi: Đậu bướm